Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 2. Justice of Peace Court System [Repealed]

§§ 5-4-201 through 5-4-224.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 214, §§ 1 - 23 and Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 1, pertained to the justice of the peace court system.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.